Missouri, session 2026, SB1192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.1570, to read as
follows:
173.1570. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Accreditation", the status of public recognition
that an accrediting agency grants to an educational
institution, program, or both that meets the agency's
standards and requirements;
(2) "Accrediting agency", a person or governmental
entity that conducts accrediting activities and makes
decisions concerning the accreditation or pre-accreditation
status of institutions, programs, or both. The term
includes any national, regional, or programmatic accrediting
agency;
(3) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion", any
differential treatment of, or assignment of any fault or
blame to, an individual or group at an institution of higher
education based on race; color; ethnicity; national origin,
other than as it relates to immigration status under United

SB 1192 2
States law; sex, other than as it relates to sex-segregated
facilities, such as dormitories and bathrooms, or to
athletic programs; sexual orientation; or gender identity;
(4) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion practice or
procedure", any initiative, policy, program, mandate,
requirement, standard, metric, statistic, or other practice
or procedure related to diversity, equity, and inclusion;
(5) "Institution of higher education", a public
postsecondary educational institution in this state,
including all of the institution's programs, departments,
divisions, offices, centers, colleges, and schools, and any
person acting on behalf of any of the foregoing.
2. When taking any action involving the accreditation
or renewal of accreditation of an institution of higher
education, an accrediting agency shall not:
(1) Base its accrediting decision in any way on a
review or consideration of any diversity, equity, and
inclusion practice or procedure;
(2) Collect information related to any diversity,
equity, and inclusion practice or procedure; or
(3) Include any requirement related to any diversity,
equity, and inclusion practice or procedure.
3. An accrediting agency shall implement policies to
ensure that a person who has any decision-making or
recommendation authority related to the accreditation or
renewal of accreditation of an institution of higher
education does not collect and is not presented with any
information regarding any diversity, equity, and inclusion
practice or procedure.
4. Any current or former student or employee of an
institution of higher education may bring a civil action
against an accrediting agency that conducts accrediting

SB 1192 3
activities and makes decisions concerning the accreditation
of such institution for any violation of subsection 2 or 3
of this section that occurred while such person was a
student or employee of such institution and that involves
such agency's accreditation of such institution. Such
action shall be brought in the county where the violation
occurred. If the court finds that the accrediting agency
violated subsection 2 or 3 of this section, in addition to
any other legal or equitable remedies which in the judgment
of the court shall be appropriate, the accrediting agency
shall pay:
(1) The prevailing party's reasonable attorney's fees
and court costs;
(2) Damages to the prevailing party in an amount equal
to three times the amount of money paid by the institution
of higher education to the accrediting agency during the
applicable time period, which shall be defined as the
duration of the accrediting agency's violation, as well as
the five years prior to the violation, including dues, fees,
and any other payments; and
(3) Civil penalties of either:
(a) Up to one thousand dollars per student who
attended the institution of higher education at the time
when the violation occurred; or
(b) If no students attended the institution of higher
education at the time when the violation occurred, up to one
thousand dollars per student who attended the institution
during the semester immediately preceding the time when the
violation occurred.
5. Any violation of subsection 2 or 3 of this section
shall constitute an unlawful discriminatory practice, as
defined in section 213.010, and an unfair and unlawful

SB 1192 4
practice, as provided in subsection 1 of section 407.020.
The attorney general may investigate and seek appropriate
remedies for any violation of subsection 2 or 3 of this
section to the full extent provided by law.
✓